src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/A-Clex_styeres_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Adjective - styeres: # 
    styeres+A+Sg+Nom: styeres
    styeres+A+Attr: stuorrâ
    styeres+A+Sg+Gen: stuárrá
    styeres+A+Sg+Acc: stuárrá
    styeres+A+Sg+Ill: stuárrás
    styeres+A+Sg+Loc: stuárrást
    styeres+A+Sg+Com: stuárráin
    styeres+A+Sg+Abe: stuárráttáá
    styeres+A+Ess: styeresin
    styeres+A+Par: styeresid
    styeres+A+Pl+Nom: stuárráh
    styeres+A+Pl+Gen: stuárrái
    styeres+A+Pl+Acc: stuárráid
    styeres+A+Pl+Ill: stuárráid
    styeres+A+Pl+Loc: stuárráin
    styeres+A+Pl+Com: [stuárráiguin, stuárráigijn]
    styeres+A+Pl+Abe: stuárráittáá

    styeres+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: stuárráb
    styeres+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Gen: stuárráb
    styeres+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Acc: stuárráb
    styeres+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Ill: stuárráábân
    styeres+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Loc: stuárráábist
    styeres+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Com: stuárráábáin
    styeres+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Abe: stuárrábttáá
    styeres+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Nom: stuárráábeh
    styeres+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Gen: stuárráábij
    styeres+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: stuárráábijd
    styeres+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Ill: stuárráábáid
    styeres+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Loc: stuárráábijn
    styeres+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Com: [stuárráábijguin, stuárráábijgijn]
    styeres+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Abe: stuárráábijttáá
    styeres+A+Der/Comp+A+Ess: stuárráábin
    styeres+A+Der/Comp+A+Par: stuárráábid

    styeres+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: stuárráámus
    styeres+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Gen: stuárráámuu
    styeres+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Acc: stuárráámuu
    styeres+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Ill: stuárráámusân
    styeres+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Loc: stuárráámuust
    styeres+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Com: stuárráámuin
    styeres+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Abe: stuárráámuuttáá
    styeres+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Nom: stuárráámuuh
    styeres+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Gen: stuárráámui
    styeres+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Acc: stuárráámuid
    styeres+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Ill: stuárráámuid
    styeres+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Loc: stuárráámuin
    styeres+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Com: [stuárráámuiguin, stuárráámuigijn]
    styeres+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Abe: stuárráámuittáá
    styeres+A+Der/Superl+A+Ess: stuárráámussân
    styeres+A+Der/Superl+A+Par: stuárráámussâd
